Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-294
Possession; proof by affidavit; recording.

For the purpose of sections 25-207, 25-213, 40-104, and 76-288 to 76-298, the fact of possession of real estate referred to in section 76-288 may be shown of record by one or more affidavits which shall contain the legal description of the real estate referred to and show that the record titleholder is upon the date thereof in possession of such real estate. The register of deeds shall record such affidavit or affidavits in the miscellaneous records of his county.

No such affidavits of possession shall be filed as to any real estate before the expiration of twenty-three years from the recording of deed of conveyance under which title is claimed, or before one year after April 8, 1947, whichever event is the latest in point of time, as to any real estate as to which a claim under the provisions of section 76-292 shall have been filed.

Laws 1947, c. 243, § 7, p. 764.